Utah statutes.
41-6a-1007.   Operators to yield right-of-way to blind pedestrian -- Duties of blind pedestrian -- Use of cane -- Failure to yield -- Liability.

(1) (a)  The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to a blind or visually impaired pedestrian:

(i)  carrying a clearly visible white cane; or

(ii)  accompanied by a guide dog specially trained for that purpose and equipped with a harness.

(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(ii), a person who fails to yield the right-of-way is liable for any loss or damage which results as a proximate cause of the failure to yield the right-of-way to blind or visually impaired persons.

(ii)  Blind or visually impaired persons shall:

(A)  exercise due care in approaching and crossing roadways; and

(B)  yield the right-of-way to authorized emergency vehicles giving an audible warning signal.

(2)  A pedestrian other than a blind or visually impaired person may not carry a cane as described in Subsection (1).

